Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Electronic Government Services

§ 25-53-151.
Electronic Government Services Fund established; Electronic Government Oversight Committee established to oversee implementation of E-Government and related technology initiatives; duties of committee; composition of committee; committee meetings; committee reports and recommendations; funding of agency expenses.

There is established in the State Treasury the “Electronic Government Services Fund,” into which shall be deposited specific funds appropriated by the Legislature for developing and providing electronic government services within the State of Mississippi. Any funds in the Electronic Government Services Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, but shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year. The funds in the Electronic Government Fund shall be available for expenditure pursuant to specific appropriation by the Legislature beginning in fiscal year 2002, to the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services.

There is hereby established an Electronic Government Oversight Committee to oversee the implementation of E-Government and related technology initiatives. Duties of this committee would include: (a) prioritize and make recommendations for all electronic government services, in order to cut across state and local governmental organizational structures; (b) address policy issues such as privacy, security, transaction fees and accessibility; (c) review ongoing fiscal and operational management and support of portal; (d) provide a mechanism for gathering input from citizens, businesses and government entities; (e) encourage self-service models for citizens through state websites and other electronic services; and (f) promote economic development and efficient delivery of government services by encouraging governmental and private sector entities to conduct their business and transactions using electronic media. The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following: (a) the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, or his designee; (b) the State Auditor, or his designee; (c) the State Treasurer, or his designee; (d) the Secretary of State, or his designee; (e) the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or his designee; (f) the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his designee; (g) the Commissioner of Revenue, or his designee. The committee shall annually elect one (1) member to serve as chairman and one (1) member to serve as vice chairman, who shall act as chairman in the absence of the chairman. The committee shall meet monthly or upon the call of the chairman, and shall make necessary reports and recommendations to the Legislature and the appropriate agencies of state government. All agencies of state government shall cooperate with the committee in providing requested information, shall work closely with and provide information to the committee and shall report to the committee at its request. The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall provide administrative support for the committee. Nonlegislative members of the committee shall serve without compensation.

The Electronic Government Oversight Committee shall advise and provide direction to the Department of Finance and Administration to develop a procurement portal that will enable potential vendors of goods and services to access relevant and necessary information related to the sale of the following types of goods and services to the State of Mississippi and its agencies:

Commodities, as defined by Section 31-7-1;

Contract personnel, as defined by Sections 25-9-107 and 25-9-120; and

Computer equipment and services, as defined by Section 25-53-3.

The procurement portal provided for in subsection (3) must provide potential vendors with the following:

A searchable database of business procurement opportunities with the state which includes a breakdown by product or service and by the organization seeking the product or service;

Listings of the published date and closing date for each business procurement opportunity;

A “Frequently Asked Questions” section regarding doing business with the respective agencies;

A breakdown of “Frequently Asked Questions” regarding the selection process with the respective agencies;

An open-air forum for questions and answers relating to the procurement process, in general, as well as specifically relating to a single contract; and

Links to individual agency websites and contacts to enable potential vendors to obtain more specific information, if necessary.

The procurement portal must be linked to the Transparency Mississippi website established in accordance with Sections 27-104-151 through 27-104-163. The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services shall develop and maintain a link to the procurement portal from the state website.

From and after July 1, 2018, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund. In addition, in order to receive the maximum use and benefit from information technology and services, expenses for the provision of statewide shared services that facilitate cost-effective information processing and telecommunication solutions shall be defrayed by pass-through funding and shall be deposited into the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services Revolving Fund unless otherwise specified by the Legislature. These funds shall only be utilized to pay the actual costs incurred by the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for providing these shared services to state agencies. Furthermore, state agencies shall work in full cooperation with the Board of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services (MDITS) to identify computer equipment or services to minimize duplication, reduce costs, and improve the efficiency of providing common technology services across agency boundaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 447, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 19; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 433, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.